hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Hranilice i pomoćne sjedalice: Pomoćne sjedalice za hranjenje; Sklopive hranilice; Setovi hranilica za novorođenčad i bebe; Hranilice; Stolne hranilice
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > เก้าอี้ขายาวสำหรับเด็กเล็กและบูสเตอร์ซีท: ที่นั่งให้อาหารเสริม; เก้าอี้ขายาวแบบปรับได้; ชุดเก้าอี้ทรงสูงสำหรับทารกแรกเกิดและเด็กเล็ก; เก้าอี้ขายาว; ที่นั่งแบบตะขอเกี่ยว
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 儿童餐椅/餐椅垫: 辅助喂食座椅; 可转换高脚椅; 高脚椅新生儿和婴儿套装; 高脚椅; 挂钩式座椅
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > ハイチェア・ベビーチェア: 食事用ブースターシート; コンバーチブルハイチェア; ハイチェア新生児・ベビーセット; ハイチェア; フックオンシート
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Krzesełka do karmienia i siedziska na krzesła: Podkładki do fotelika do karmienia; Składane krzesełka do karmienia; Zestawy do krzesełek do karmienia dla noworodków i niemowląt; Krzesełka do karmienia; Krzesełka zawieszane
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Cadeirões e assentos elevatórios: Cadeira de alimentação com altura ajustável; Cadeirões conversíveis; Conjuntos de cadeirão para recém-nascidos e bebês; Cadeirões; Assentos de encaixe
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Barnstolar och sittdynor: Barnmatstolar; Konvertibla barnstolar; Babyset och nyföddinsatser till barnmatstolar; Barnstolar; Barnstol som fästs i bordsskiva
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 高腳椅和輔助椅: 增高餵食座椅; 兩用高腳椅; 兒童高腳椅新生兒與嬰兒套組; 高腳椅; 掛鉤式嬰兒座椅
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Високи столчета и бустерни седалки: Бустерни седалки за столчета за хранене; Трансформируеми високи столчета; Комплекти за новородени и бебета за столчета за хранене; Високи столчета; Закачащи се седалки
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Højstole og børnesæder: Boostersæder til madning; Konvertible højstole; Nyfødt- og babysæt til højstole; Højstole; Hook-On-sæder
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Vysoké stoličky a podsedáky: Stoličky na kŕmenie; Konvertibilné vysoké stoličky; Sady detských jedálenských stoličiek pre novorodencov a bábätká; Vysoké stoličky; Stolové sedadlá
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské židličky a sedačky: Podsedáky na jídelní židli; Kombinované dětské židličky; Novorozenecké a dětské sady pro jídelní židličky; Dětské židličky; Přídavné dětské židličky
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Высокие стульчики и сиденья-бустеры: Сиденья-бустеры для кормления; Высокие стульчики-трансформеры; Наборы к детским стульчикам для новорожденных и малышей; Высокие стульчики; Подвесные стульчики для кормления
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Scaune înalte și scaune de ridicare: Scaune de ridicare pentru hrănire; Scaune înalte convertibile; Seturi de scaune înalte pentru nou-născuți și bebeluși; Scaune înalte; Scaune cu prindere cu cârlige
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Barnestoler og barneseter: Spisestoler for barn; Konvertible barnestoler; Baby- og nyfødtsett til høystol; Barnestoler; Krokseter
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Hochstühle & Sitzerhöhungen: Sitzerhöhungen fürs Füttern; Umwandelbare Hochstühle; Neugeborenen- & Babysets für Hochstühle; Hochstühle; Tischsitze
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Assentos para bancos elevatórios e cadeiras de refeição: Cadeirinhas de alimentação; Cadeiras altas conversíveis; Conjuntos de recém-nascido e bebé para cadeira da papa; Cadeiras altas; Assentos com gancho
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Καρέκλες φαγητού & ενισχυτικά καθίσματα: Ενισχυτικά καθίσματα φαγητού; Μετατρέψιμες καρέκλες φαγητού; Σετ καρέκλας φαγητού για νεογέννητα & μωρά; Καρέκλες φαγητού; Καθίσματα που προσαρμόζονται στο τραπέζι
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Syöttötuolit ja istuinkorokkeet: Syöttötuolin korokkeet; Muunnettavat syöttötuolit; Syöttötuolien vauvasetit; Syöttötuolit; Kiinnitettävät istuimet
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 유아용 식탁 의자/보조 의자: 부스터 수유 시트; 컨버터블 유아용 식탁 의자; 하이체어 신생아 및 영유아 세트; 유아용 식탁 의자; 식탁에 고정하는 유아용 식탁 의자
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Aukštos kėdutės ir sėdynių pagalvėlės: Aukštos maitinimo kėdutės; Transformuojamos aukštos kėdutės; Vaikiškos maitinimo kėdutės naujagimiams ir kūdikiams; Aukštos kėdutės; Užkabinamosios sėdynės
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Mama Sandalyeleri ve Yükselen Koltuklar: Yükseltici Çocuk Yemek Koltukları; Dönüştürülebilir Mama Sandalyeleri; Mama sandalyesi yenidoğan ve bebek setleri; Mama Sandalyesi; Kancalı Koltuklar
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Chaises hautes et réhausseurs: Réhausseurs de chaise pour repas; Chaises hautes convertibles; Kits de chaises hautes pour nouveau-nés et bébés; Chaises hautes; Sièges à accrocher
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Seggioloni e seggiolini: Alzasedia; Seggioloni convertibili; Set per seggioloni per neonati e bambini; Seggioloni; Sedili agganciabili
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > High Chairs & Booster Seats: Booster Feeding Seats; Convertible High Chairs; High Chair Newborn & Baby Sets; High Chairs; Hook-On Seats
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Tronas y alzadores: Asientos elevadores para alimentación; Tronas convertibles; Sets para recién nacidos y bebés de sillas altas; Sillas altas; Asientos con gancho
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Ghế ngồi ăn và nghế nâng: Ghế ăn tiện lợi; Ghế ngồi ăn đa năng; Bộ ghế ăn dặm cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Ghế ngồi ăn; Ghế móc treo
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Stolčki za hranjenje in blazine za stolček: Podporni sedeži za hranjenje; Prilagodljivi stolčki za hranjenje; Kompleti stolčkov za hranjenje za novorojenčke in dojenčke; Stolčki za hranjenje; Pritrdljivi stolčki
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Etetőszékek és ülésmagasítók: Magasító etetőülések; Átalakítható etetőszékek; Etetőszék-szettek újszülötteknek és babáknak; Etetőszékek; Akasztós ülések
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers: Stoelverhoger met eetblad; Converteerbare kinderstoelen; Kinderstoelsets voor pasgeborenen en baby's; Kinderstoelen; Aanhaakbare stoelen